Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB63.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 241.060 is amended to read as follows:
The board shall have the following functions, powers, and duties:
(1) To promulgate reasonable administrative regulations governing procedures relative
to the applications for and revocations of licenses, the supervision and control of the
use, manufacture, sale, transportation, storage, advertising, and trafficking of
alcoholic beverages, and all other matters over which the board has jurisdiction.
The only administrative regulation that shall be promulgated in relation to the direct
shipper license is to establish the license application, as set forth in KRS
243.027(4). To the extent any administrative regulation previously promulgated is
contrary to the provisions of KRS 13A.120(2), the board shall repeal or amend the
administrative regulation as necessary by January 1, 2022. Administrative
regulations need not be uniform in their application but may vary in accordance
with reasonable classifications;
(2) To limit in its sound discretion the number of licenses of each kind or class to be
issued in this state or any political subdivision, and restrict the locations of licensed
premises. To this end, the board may make reasonable division and subdivision of
the state or any political subdivision into districts. Administrative regulations
relating to the approval, denial, and revocation of licenses may be different within
the several divisions or subdivisions;
(3) To hold hearings in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B. The
department may pay witnesses the per diem and mileage provided in KRS 421.015;
(4) To conduct hearings and appeals under KRS 241.150, 241.200, 241.260, 243.470,
and 243.520[, 438.308, 438.309, 438.312, 438.316, and 438.340] and render final
orders upon the subjects of the hearings and appeals;
(5) (a) To order the destruction of evidence, other than contraband alcoholic
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 1/4/2025 10:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1015
beverages suitable for public auction under paragraph (b) of this subsection, in
the department's possession after all administrative and judicial proceedings
are conducted.
(b) To dispose of contraband alcoholic beverages through public auction if:
1. A final order relating to those contraband alcoholic beverages has been
entered after all administrative and judicial proceedings are conducted,
if applicable;
2. The entire proceeds of the public auction are donated to the alcohol
wellness and responsibility education fund established in KRS 211.285;
and
3. The board deems the inventory safe to release to the public, including
but not limited to the alcoholic beverages being in their original,
unopened packaging;
(6) To suspend, revoke, or cancel for cause, after a hearing in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B, any license; and
(7) To prohibit the issuance of a license for the premises until the expiration of two (2)
years from the time the offense was committed if a violation of KRS Chapters 241
to 244 has taken place on the premises which the owner knew of or should have
known of, or was committed or permitted in or on the premises owned by the
licensee.
Section 2. KRS 438.305 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 438.305 to 438.340, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) (a) "Alternative nicotine product" means a noncombustible product containing
nicotine that is intended for human consumption, whether chewed, absorbed,
dissolved, or ingested by any other means.
(b) "Alternative nicotine product" does not include any product regulated as a
drug or device by the United States Food and Drug Administration under
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 1/4/2025 10:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1015
Chapter V of the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
(2) ["Authorized vapor product" means a vapor product containing nicotine for which
the manufacturer has obtained:
(a) Authorization from the FDA; or
(b) A safe harbor certification;
(3) "Department" means the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control;
(4) "FDA" means the United States Food and Drug Administration;
(5) ]"Manufacturer" means any person who manufactures or produces tobacco products
within or without this Commonwealth;
(3)[(6)] "Nonresident wholesaler" means any person who purchases cigarettes or other
tobacco products directly from the manufacturer and maintains a permanent
location or locations outside this state at which Kentucky cigarette tax evidence is
attached or from which Kentucky cigarette tax is reported and paid;
(4)[(7)] "Proof of age" means a driver's license or other documentary or written
evidence of an individual's age;
(5)[(8)] "Resident wholesaler" means any person who purchases at least seventy-five
percent (75%) of all cigarettes or other tobacco products purchased by that person
directly from the cigarette manufacturer on which the cigarette tax provided for in
KRS 138.130 to 138.205 is unpaid, and who maintains an established place of
business in this state at which the person attaches cigarette tax evidence or receives
untaxed cigarettes;
[(9) "Retailer" means any person, online or in person, who sells tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products, or vapor products to a consumer for any purpose other
than resale;
(10) "Safe harbor certification":
(a) Means a certification provided by a manufacturer establishing that a vapor
product:
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 1/4/2025 10:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1015
1. Falls within a safe harbor established by the FDA by the manufacturer's
timely pursuing the path to market described in subparagraph 2. of this
paragraph; and
2. Is a nicotine product containing tobacco-derived nicotine that was
commercially marketed in the United States as of August 8, 2016, for which
the manufacturer submitted a premarket tobacco product application on or
before September 9, 2020, to the FDA that:
a. Remains under review, but has not received either a marketing denial order or
a marketing granted order;
b. Has received a marketing denial order, but remains under a stay by the FDA
or continues to be subject to an appeal to or review by a court of competent
jurisdiction; or
c. Has had a marketing denial order that has been rescinded by the FDA or
vacated by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(b) Shall contain a copy of the first page of the communication from the FDA
reflecting an acceptance for review or the submission tracking number or, if
on appeal, a copy of the first page of the document filed with the applicable
agency or court; and
(c) May be provided and maintained in hard copy or in electronic form;]
(6)[(11)] "Sample" means a tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor
product distributed to members of the general public at no cost;
(7)[(12)] "Subjobber" means any person who purchases tobacco products, on which the
Kentucky cigarette tax has been paid, from a wholesaler licensed pursuant to KRS
138.195, and makes them available to a retail establishment for resale;
[(13) "Tobacco noncompliance database and reporting system" means the database of
retailers that have violated KRS 438.312 or 438.316 developed and maintained by
the department under KRS 438.307;]
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 1/4/2025 10:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1015
(8)[(14)] (a) "Tobacco product" means any cigarette, cigar, snuff, smokeless tobacco
product, smoking tobacco, chewing tobacco, and any kind or form of tobacco
prepared in a manner suitable for chewing or smoking, or both, or any kind or
form of tobacco that is suitable to be placed in a person's mouth. "Tobacco
product" also means any product made or derived from tobacco that is
intended for human consumption, including any component, part, or accessory
of a tobacco product, except for raw materials other than tobacco used in
manufacturing any component, part, or accessory of a tobacco product, in
accordance with the federal Tobacco Control Act, Pub. L. No. 111-31.
(b) "Tobacco product" does not include any alternative nicotine product, vapor
product, or product regulated as a drug or device by the United States Food
and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
Act[;
(15) "Unauthorized vapor product":
(a) Means any vapor product that has not been authorized by the FDA; and
(b) Does not include a vapor product for which the manufacturer has received:
1. A marketing granted order or other authorization to market from the
FDA; or
2. A safe harbor certification]; and
(9)[(16)] (a) "Vapor product" means any noncombustible product that employs a
heating element, battery, power source, electronic circuit, or other electronic,
chemical, or mechanical means, regardless of shape or size and including the
component parts and accessories thereto, that can be used to deliver vaporized
nicotine or other substances to users inhaling from the device. "Vapor
product" includes but is not limited to any device deemed to be an electronic
nicotine delivery system by the United States Food and Drug Administration,
any electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe,
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 1/4/2025 10:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1015
or similar product or device and every variation thereof, regardless of whether
marketed as such, and any vapor cartridge or other container of a liquid
solution or other material that is intended to be used with or in an electronic
cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or other similar
product or device.
(b) "Vapor product" does not include any product regulated as a drug or device
by the United States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.
Section 3. KRS 438.310 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No person shall sell or cause to be sold any tobacco product,[ or] alternative
nicotine product, or vapor product at retail to any person under the age of twenty-
one (21), or solicit any person under the age of twenty-one (21) to purchase any
tobacco product or alternative nicotine product at retail.
(2) Any person who sells tobacco products,[ or] alternative nicotine products, or vapor
products at retail shall cause to be posted in a conspicuous place in his or her
establishment a notice stating that it is illegal to sell tobacco products, alternative
nicotine products, or vapor products to persons under age twenty-one (21).
(3) Any person selling tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor
products shall require proof of age from a prospective buyer or recipient if the
person has reason to believe that the prospective buyer or recipient is under the age
of twenty-one (21).
(4) A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be subject to a fine
of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars
($500) for a first violation and a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500)
nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for any subsequent violation. The fine
shall be administered by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control using a
civil enforcement procedure.
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 1/4/2025 10:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1015
Section 4. KRS 438.313 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No wholesaler, retailer, or manufacturer of cigarettes, tobacco products,[ or]
alternative nicotine products, or vapor products may distribute cigarettes, tobacco
products, [or ]alternative nicotine products, or vapor products, including samples
thereof, free of charge or otherwise, to any person under the age of twenty-one (21).
(2) Any person who distributes cigarettes, tobacco products,[ or] alternative nicotine
products, or vapor products, including samples thereof, free of charge or otherwise
shall require proof of age from a prospective buyer or recipient if the person has
reason to believe that the prospective purchaser or recipient is under the age of
twenty-one (21).
(3) Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be fined not less than
one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500) for each offense. The fine shall be administered by the Department of
Alcoholic Beverage Control using a civil enforcement procedure for persons
eighteen (18) years of age or older.
(4) All peace officers with general law enforcement authority and employees of the
Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control may issue a uniform citation, but may
not make an arrest, or take a child into custody, for a violation of this section.
Section 5. The following KRS sections are repealed:
438.306 Retailer to disclose to Secretary of State whether it sells authorized vapor
products -- Secretary of State to maintain list of retailers.
438.307 Enforcement by Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control -- Online
publication of list of retailers of authorized vapor products.
438.308 Duties and responsibilities of manufacturers of vapor products.
438.309 Duties and responsibilities of wholesalers.
438.312 Prohibition on retailers distributing authorized vapor products to any person
under age 21 -- Affirmative defense -- Penalties.
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 1/4/2025 10:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1015
438.316 Prohibition on sale of unauthorized vapor products -- Safe harbor certification -
- Penalties.
438.331 Enforcement by certified peace officers -- Citations.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 1/4/2025 10:06 AM Jacketed